Illinois, session 104th, SB2794.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Insurance Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 61405-52 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1405/1405-52 new)8    Sec. 1405-52. State subsidy program for health insurance 9premiums. The Department shall establish and administer a 10State subsidy program to offset some, if not all, of the costs 11associated with the expiration of the enhanced federal tax 12credits that subsidize health insurance premiums. The 13Department shall adopt any rules deemed necessary to implement 14this Section. In order to provide for the expeditious and 15timely implementation of this Act, the Department may adopt 16emergency rules. 17    Section 10. The Governor's Office of Management and Budget 18Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 19    (20 ILCS 3005/10)20    Sec. 10. Budget Reserve for Immediate Disbursements and 21Governmental Emergencies Fund.   SB2794- 2 -LRB104 17549 HLH 30977 b1    (a) There is created in the State treasury as a special 2fund the Budget Reserve for Immediate Disbursements and 3Governmental Emergencies (BRIDGE) Fund. The Fund may receive 4revenue from any authorized source, including, but not limited 5to, gifts, grants, awards, transfers, and appropriated 6deposits. Moneys in the fund shall be used to provide 7supplemental moneys for other funds held in the State treasury 8in the event of unanticipated delays in or failures of 9revenues when supplemental moneys are required to effectuate 10appropriations enacted by the General Assembly.11    (b) Upon the written direction of the Governor, the State 12Comptroller shall direct, and the State Treasurer shall 13transfer, specified amounts held in the BRIDGE Fund to 14specified funds in the State treasury for expenditure pursuant 15to appropriations from funds so specified. Upon the written 16direction of the Governor, the State Comptroller shall direct, 17and the State Treasurer shall transfer, specified amounts from 18funds in the State treasury that have received transfers from 19the BRIDGE Fund to repay, in whole or in part, amounts 20previously transferred pursuant to this subsection (b).21    (c) The Governor shall direct the State Comptroller and 22the State Treasurer to set aside the sum of $75,000,000 from 23the Budget Reserve for Immediate Disbursements and 24Governmental Emergencies (BRIDGE) Fund to fund the State 25subsidy program established under Section 1405-52 of the 26Department of Insurance Law of the Civil Administrative Code   SB2794- 3 -LRB104 17549 HLH 30977 b1of Illinois. 2(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 3    Section 15. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 4amended by adding Section 5-45.71 as follows: 5    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)6    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking; health insurance. To 7provide for the expeditious and timely implementation of 8Section 1405-52 of the Department of Insurance Law of the 9Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, emergency rules 10implementing the program established under Section 1405-52 of 11the Department of Insurance Law of the Civil Administrative 12Code of Illinois may be adopted in accordance with Section 135-45 by the Department of Insurance. The adoption of emergency 14rules authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to 15be necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.16    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 17of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.